Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3306
Order; service; return.

A copy of the order shall be given to the individual at the time it is served on him. No more than thirty days after the identification procedures have been carried out, a return of the order shall be made to the issuing court setting forth the type of evidence taken. Where the order is not executed, a return so indicating shall be filed within thirty days of its issuance.

Laws 1971, LB 568, § 6.

The identifying physical characteristics statutes require a showing of probable cause to believe the person seized has engaged in an articulable criminal offense before the judicial officer can issue an order to produce identifying physical characteristics. State v. Marcus, 265 Neb. 910, 660 N.W.2d 837 (2003).

When determining whether an order to produce identifying physical characteristics was based on a showing of probable cause, a court considers the totality of the circumstances. State v. Marcus, 265 Neb. 910, 660 N.W.2d 837 (2003).